Washington statutes.
RCW 6.01.020

Entry of judgment—Superior court—District court—Small claims.

For purposes of this title and RCW 4.56.190 and 4.56.210, a judgment of a superior court is entered when it is delivered to the clerk's office for filing. A judgment of a district court of this state is entered on the date of the entry of the judgment in the docket of the court. A judgment of a small claims department of a district court of this state is entered on the date of the entry in the docket of that department.

[ 1987 c 442 s 102.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 58(b).